Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF985.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1686HZ (3) 91 da/jh H.F. 985 Section 1. Section 9.4, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 9.4 Fees. 3 1. The secretary of state shall collect all fees directed 4 by law to be collected by the secretary of state, including a 5 fee to be determined by the secretary of state by rule adopted 6 pursuant to chapter 17A for a copy of any law or record. 7 2. a. The secretary of state shall adopt rules pursuant to 8 chapter 17A that specify additional fee amounts to be imposed 9 by the secretary of state for performing services under law. 10 b. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and for 11 each fiscal year thereafter, the secretary of state shall not 12 collect additional fee amounts imposed under paragraph âaâ of 13 more than two million dollars. 14 c. The secretary of state shall deposit additional fee 15 amounts imposed under paragraph âaâ and collected under 16 paragraph âbâ in the business services modernization fund 17 created pursuant to section 9.4A. 18 Sec. 2. Section 9.4A, Code 2025, is amended to read as 19 follows: 20 9.4A Technology Business services modernization fund. 21 1. A technology modernization business services 22 modernization fund is created in the state treasury under 23 the control of the secretary of state. Moneys in the fund 24 are appropriated to the secretary of state for purposes of 25 modernizing technology used by the secretary of state to 26 fulfill the duties of office. 27 2. On and after For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2022 28 2025 , and for each fiscal year thereafter, any unobligated or 29 unencumbered moneys remaining in this the business services 30 modernization fund are appropriated to the secretary of state 31 for purposes of modernization modernizing operations within the 32 business services division until fully expended or until June 33 30, 2026, whichever occurs first . 34 3. This section is repealed July 1, 2026. 35 -1- LSB 1686HZ (3) 91 da/jh 1/ 4 H.F. 985 Sec. 3. Section 9.15, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 9.15 Expedited filing service ââ surcharge. 3 1. Upon the request of the filer of a document, the 4 secretary shall provide an expedited filing service. As part 5 of the service, the secretary shall file a document submitted 6 by a filer on an expedited basis. 7 2. The secretary shall implement, assess, and collect a 8 surcharge for providing the expedited filing service based on 9 the period of service as follows: 10 a. For a one-hour service, the surcharge shall be two 11 hundred fifty dollars. 12 b. For a same-day service, the surcharge shall be one 13 hundred seventy-five dollars. 14 c. For a two-day service, the surcharge shall be fifty 15 dollars. 16 b. d. For a five-day service, the surcharge shall be 17 fifteen dollars. 18 3. The surcharge shall be added to the amount of the fee 19 implemented, assessed, and collected for the actual filing of 20 the document. 21 4. At the time of the expedited filing, the secretary shall 22 provide written confirmation of the filing. 23 4. 5. Any moneys collected by the secretary under this 24 section shall be deposited in the business administration fund 25 created in section 9.13 . 26